Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB965.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 54AMATERNAL HEALTH MONITORING PILOT PROGRAMSec.54A01. Definitions.54A02. Establishment of pilot program.54A03. Administration of pilot program.54A04. Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes requirements.54A05. Duties of each managed care organization.54A06. Implementation of program in counties.54A07. Fee payment for administration of pilot program.123456789101112131415161718 54A08. Operation of pilot program.54A09. Report.54A10. Expiration of authority.§ 54A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Clinical team." A group made up of nurses and dietitians who:(1) Monitor eligible participants' measurements.(2) Provide nutrition guidance.(3) Provide diabetes and hypertension condition management counseling.(4) Provide pregnancy and postpartum advice."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Eligible participant." A patient who is:(1) a recipient of medical assistance;(2) a member of a participating managed care organization; and(3) pregnant."Escalation pathway." An agreement between the participating managed care organizations and the selected vendor on a process to follow when an eligible participant's measurements are concerning and warrant further review and investigation."Health care provider." An obstetrician or maternal fetal medicine physician who:(1) is licensed in this Commonwealth;(2) is in-network of the participating managed care organization; and(3) is caring for an eligible participant during 20250SB0965PN1105 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pregnancy."Maternity care desert." An area that does not have any of the following:(1) A hospital providing obstetric care.(2) A birth center.(3) An obstetrician gynecologist.(4) A certified nurse midwife."Participating managed care organizations." The managed care organizations selected by the department under section 54A03 (relating to administration of pilot program)."Pilot program." The Maternal Health Monitoring Pilot Program established under section 54A02 (relating to establishment of pilot program)."Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes." Technology provided by the selected vendor that meets all of the following criteria:(1) The technology collects health data from an eligible participant and electronically transmits that information securely for interpretation and recommendation.(2) The technology uses a device that meets all of the following criteria:(i) The device is compliant with 42 U.S.C. Ch. 7 Subch. XI Pt. C (relating to administrative simplification).(ii) The device is authorized by the United States Food and Drug Administration.(3) The technology monitors health data, including blood pressure, weight, blood glucose levels or other physiologic health data as determined by the eligible participant's health care provider.20250SB0965PN1105 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The technology is capable of transmitting health data through cellular networks.(5) The technology is preprogrammed, specific to each participant and functions directly out of the box for the participant."Selected vendor." The technology company selected by the department to contract with the participating managed care organizations in administering the pilot program."Technology." Cellular connected devices that deliver remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes such as blood pressure monitors, blood glucose meters and scales.§ 54A02. Establishment of pilot program.For fiscal years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028, the Maternal Health Monitoring Pilot Program is established within the department to offer eligible participants improved maternal health care through remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes.§ 54A03. Administration of pilot program.The department shall select one or more managed care organizations and one selected vendor to administer the pilot program in a manner determined by the department.§ 54A04. Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes requirements.The selected vendor shall meet the following requirements when offering remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes to an eligible participant under the pilot program:(1) Ensure that remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes is possible during 20250SB0965PN1105 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pregnancy and for up to three months postpartum.(2) Ensure that remote patient monitoring devices are delivered to the eligible participant.(3) Ensure that the eligible participant has a process to be trained on how to use the remote patient monitoring devices.(4) Employ a clinical team that is capable of the following:(i) Monitoring and reviewing participants' health data.(ii) Creating an escalation pathway with the participating managed care organizations if the eligible participant's remote patient monitoring readings, in conjunction with the eligible participant's symptoms, require additional medical attention.(iii) Providing health coaching to participants, including nutrition, condition management and healthy behavior modification.(5) Assign a program manager to support implementation and administration of the pilot program and to coordinate efforts with the participating managed care organizations and department.§ 54A05. Duties of each managed care organization.Each participating managed care organization shall:(1) Contract directly with the selected vendor to offer remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes to eligible participants.(2) Ensure that eligible patients have access to the pilot program.§ 54A06. Implementation of program in counties.20250SB0965PN1105 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall implement the pilot program in as many counties as necessary to ensure participation of no more than 300 eligible participants. The following shall apply:(1) The department shall implement the pilot program in at least one county with a maternity care desert.(2) The department shall implement the pilot program in at least one rural county, as defined by the Center for Rural Pennsylvania.§ 54A07. Fee payment for administration of pilot program.(a) Fee payment.--The department shall pay a fee, totaling no more than $600,000 in the aggregate, to the participating managed care organizations to administer the pilot program.(b) Use of fee.--The participating managed care organization shall use the fee payment under subsection (a) to cover the costs of the following:(1) contracting with the selected vendor under section 54A03 (relating to administration of pilot program); and(2) administering the pilot program.§ 54A08. Operation of pilot program.(a) Number of participants.--The department shall ensure that the pilot program has no more than 300 eligible participants.(b) Date of operation.--The pilot program shall be operational no later than 180 days after the contract date between the participating managed care organizations and the selected vendor under section 54A03 (relating to administration of pilot program).§ 54A09. Report.No later than 24 months after the expiration of the pilot program, the department shall collaborate with the participating 20250SB0965PN1105 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 managed care organizations and any other relevant stakeholders to develop a report evaluating the outcomes of the pilot program, including cost savings, impact on morbidity rates and recommendations regarding whether the pilot program should be expanded throughout this Commonwealth. The department shall submit the report to all of the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.§ 54A10. Expiration of authority.The department's authority to implement the pilot program shall expire two years after the date that the pilot program is operational.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0965PN1105 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324